North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-01 Powers of Incompetents

14-01-01.
Person without understanding — Contract rights — Liability for necessaries.

A person entirely without understanding has no power to make a contract of any kind, but is liable for the reasonable value of things furnished to the person necessary for the person’s support or the support of the person’s family.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 20; R.C. 1895, § 2706; R.C. 1899, § 2706; R.C. 1905, § 4018; C.L. 1913, § 4343; R.C. 1943, § 14-0101.

Cross-References.

Capacity to contract, see N.D.C.C. §§ 9-02-01, 9-02-02.

Guardianship and protective proceedings, see N.D.C.C. chs. 30.1-26 to 30.1-29.

Requisites of contracts, see N.D.C.C. § 9-01-02.

When incompetent subjected to exemplary damages, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-08.

Who may appoint an agent, see N.D.C.C. § 3-01-04.

14-01-02.
Partial incapacity — Contracts — Rescission.

A conveyance or other contract of a person of unsound mind, but not entirely without understanding, made before the person’s incapacity has been determined judicially upon application for the appointment of a guardian is subject to rescission as provided by the laws of this state.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 21; R.C. 1895, § 2707; R.C. 1899, § 2707; R.C. 1905, § 4019; C.L. 1913, § 4344; R.C. 1943, § 14-0102.

Cross-References.

Rescission of contracts, see N.D.C.C. ch. 9-09.

14-01-03.
Insane person — Cannot contract after incapacity determined — Right to make will.

After a person’s incapacity has been determined judicially upon application for the appointment of a guardian, a person of unsound mind can make no conveyance or other contract, nor delegate any power, nor waive any right until the person’s restoration to capacity is determined judicially. If actually restored to capacity, the person may make a will, though the person’s restoration is not determined judicially.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 22; R.C. 1895, § 2708; R.C. 1899, § 2708; R.C. 1905, § 4020; C.L. 1913, § 4345; R.C. 1943, § 14-0103.

Collateral References.

Commitment of grantor to institution for insane as ground for setting aside conveyance in consideration of support, 18 A.L.R.2d 906.

Partial invalidity of will, consideration of question of whether parts of will may be upheld notwithstanding failure of other parts for lack of testamentary mental capacity or undue influence, 64 A.L.R.3d 261.

Ademption or revocation of specific devise or bequest by guardian, committee, conservator, or trustee of mentally or physically incompetent testator, 84 A.L.R.4th 462.